Idaho, session 2025, S1198.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. The Legislature finds that
this state was founded upon the fundamental truth that all men are created
equal and endowed with inalienable rights. Among these rights is the freedom
of inquiry, which along with the principle of liberal toleration is essen-
tial to the advancement and diffusion of knowledge. The constitution of this
state also declares that the stability of a republican form of government de-
pends mainly upon the intelligence of the people. In contravention of these
principles, a subversive ideology derived from the tenets of critical the-
ory has infected the administration of this state's system of higher educa-
tion, promoting a culture of division, ignorance, bigotry, and intolerance.
Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to eliminate all programs and
initiatives within all public institutions of higher education predicated
on the tenets of critical theory, or more commonly known under the title of
"diversity, equity, and inclusion."
SECTION 2. That Chapter 59, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-5909D, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-5909D. FREEDOM OF INQUIRY IN HIGHER EDUCATION. (1) For the purpose
of this section:
(a) "Bias reporting system" means any office, department, position, or
system whose function is to:
(i) Investigate, threaten disciplinary action, or otherwise pun-
ish enrolled students for expressions of speech protected by state
or federal law, including but not limited to speech pertaining to
disagreements of opinion, political beliefs or affiliations, or
perceived bias, prejudice, stereotypes, or intolerance; or


(ii) Solicit the reporting of incidents of student speech pro-
tected by state or federal law, including but not limited to speech
pertaining to disagreements of opinion, political beliefs or af-
filiations, or perceived bias, prejudice, stereotypes, or intol-
erance.
(b)(i) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion" or "DEI" means any
trainings, programs, activities, or instruction that is derived
from or that promotes the tenets or concepts of critical theory,
including but not limited to the concepts of unconscious or im-
plicit bias, microaggressions, internalized racism, cultural
appropriation, structural equity, settler colonialism, group
marginalization, systemic oppression, social justice, institu-
tional or systemic racism, white fragility, racial privilege,
disparate impact, intersectionality, sexual privilege, patri-
archy, gender theory, queer theory, neopronouns, transgender
ideology, misgendering, othering, deadnaming, heteronormativ-
ity, allyship, or any other related formulation of these tenets
or concepts. This definition shall also include any program, de-
cision-making process, or initiative established for the purpose
of:
1. Influencing hiring or employment practices at the in-
stitution of higher education with respect to race, color,
ethnicity, sex, disability, or religion, other than through
the use of color-blind and sex-neutral hiring processes in
accordance with any applicable state and federal anti-dis-
crimination laws;
2. Promoting differential treatment of, or providing spe-
cial benefit to, individuals on the basis of race, color,
ethnicity, sex, disability, or religion; or
3. Promoting policies or procedures designed or implemented
to provide preferential treatment with respect to race,
color, ethnicity, sex, disability, or religion, other than
policies or procedures approved in writing by the institu-
tion of higher education's legal counsel and the attorney
general of the state of Idaho for the sole purpose of ensur-
ing compliance with any applicable court order or state or
federal law.
(ii) This excludes trainings, programs, or activities developed
by an attorney or person acting under the supervision of a licensed
attorney and approved in writing by the institution of higher edu-
cation's general counsel and the attorney general of the state of
Idaho for the sole purpose of ensuring compliance with any appli-
cable court order or state or federal law.
(c)(i) "Diversity, equity, or inclusion office" means any divi-
sion, office, center, or other unit of an institution of higher
education that is responsible for creating, developing, design-
ing, implementing, organizing, planning, or promoting policies,
programming, training, practices, activities, services, or pro-
cedures relating to diversity, equity, and inclusion.
(ii) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion office" shall not include:


1. An office certified by the attorney general of the state
of Idaho as operating with the sole and exclusive mission of
ensuring legal compliance with the institution of higher ed-
ucation's obligations under title IX of the education amend-
ments of 1972, the federal Americans with disabilities act,
the federal age discrimination in employment act, title VI
of the federal civil rights act of 1964, an applicable court
order, or other applicable state or federal law;
2. An academic department defined as a unit of an institu-
tion of higher education that exists primarily for the pur-
pose of offering courses for degree credit and that does not
establish policies or procedures to which other units of the
institution of higher education are subject; or
3. A student organization that is registered with the insti-
tution of higher education.
(d)(i) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion officer" means an in-
dividual whose duties for the institution include coordinating,
creating, developing, designing, implementing, organizing, plan-
ning, or promoting policies, programming, training, practices,
activities, or procedures relating to diversity, equity, and
inclusion and who is a full-time or part-time employee of an in-
stitution of higher education or subdivision or affiliated entity
thereof or an independent contractor of an institution of higher
education.
(ii) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion officer" shall not in-
clude:
1. Any full-time or part-time employee who is a licensed at-
torney or acting under the supervision of a licensed attor-
ney and whose sole job duties related to diversity, equity,
and inclusion are to ensure compliance with the institution
of higher education's obligations under title IX of the ed-
ucation amendments of 1972, the federal Americans with dis-
abilities act, the federal age discrimination in employment
act, title VI of the federal civil rights act of 1964, ap-
plicable court orders, or other applicable state and federal
law;
2. Any faculty member while such faculty member is teaching,
engaged in research, engaged in the production of creative
works, engaged in the dissemination of research or creative
works, or advising a registered student organization; or
3. Guest speakers or performers who do not receive any form
of compensation in exchange for their presentation, perfor-
mance, or appearance.
(e)(i) "Diversity training" means a training, seminar, discus-
sion group, workshop, or other instructional program, whether
provided in-person, online, or by any other means, with a purpose
of advising, counseling, demonstrating, explaining, instructing,
or teaching participants in a way that promotes diversity, equity,
and inclusion.


(ii) "Diversity training" shall not include an academic course
offered for credit and not otherwise subject to subsection (2)(f)
or (g) of this section, counseling that involves a patient-client
relationship, or activities of a student organization registered
with an institution of higher education as long as the organiza-
tion and activity do not use state funds.
(iii) "Diversity training" does not limit or prohibit an institu-
tion of higher education's authority to establish policies that
are necessary to comply with state or federal law, including laws
relating to prohibited discrimination or harassment.
(f) "DEI-related course" means a course of instruction taken for credit
whose subject matter or pedagogical methodology is derived from or pro-
motes any of the concepts of critical theory or DEI described in this
section.
(g) "Institution of higher education" means the following entities
that are accredited by the northwest commission on colleges and uni-
versities or another accrediting body recognized by the state board of
education:
(i) Any public institution of higher education or subdivision or
affiliated entity thereof that receives funding appropriated by
the Idaho legislature; or
(ii) Any subdivision or affiliated entity of a private univer-
sity, college, or community college in Idaho that receives funding
appropriated by the Idaho legislature directly to the private in-
stitution.
(h) "Public institution of higher education" means any public univer-
sity, public college, public career technical school, or public commu-
nity college located in the state of Idaho.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no institution of
higher education in the state of Idaho, or any employee, appointee, or com-
mittee acting on behalf of an institution of higher education, shall:
(a) Discriminate against or provide preferential treatment to a
prospective student on account of such prospective student's race, sex,
color, ethnicity, or national origin during the admissions process to
determine such prospective student's acceptance into the institution
or a program of study;
(b) Discriminate against or provide preferential treatment to a
prospective employee on account of such prospective employee's race,
sex, color, ethnicity, or national origin during the hiring process;
(c) Establish, sustain, support, or staff a diversity, equity, and in-
clusion office or department; or contract, employ, engage, or hire an
individual to serve as a diversity, equity, and inclusion officer or
consultant. Any funds that would otherwise have been expended on di-
versity, equity, and inclusion offices or diversity, equity, and inclu-
sion officers in fiscal year 2026 may be reallocated, at the discretion
of the governing board of the institution of higher education, to merit
scholarships designed to reduce tuition for in-state students;
(d) Either directly or indirectly, organize, administer, conduct, pro-
mote, or sponsor diversity training;
(e) Establish, sustain, support, or staff any bias reporting system;


(f) Establish curricula or designate courses at the institution in
a manner that requires or otherwise compels a student to enroll in a
DEI-related course in order to satisfy the requirements of any aca-
demic degree program, including general education, major, minor, or
certificate requirements, except as provided in subsection (3) of this
section; or
(g) Require, solicit, or incentivize faculty to apply or participate in
DEI practices or include DEI-related content in any course as a condi-
tion of approval, designation, or listing as part of any academic degree
program, including general education, major, minor, or certificate re-
quirements, or as a condition of consideration in any faculty member's
performance assessment, promotion, tenure, salary adjustment, or any
other incentive, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Every institution of higher education in the state of Idaho shall
provide a procedure to allow the governing board of the institution of higher
education to exempt, upon written request to the board, any academic degree
program requirements of any major, minor, certificate, or department the ti-
tle of which clearly establishes its course of study as primarily focused on
racial, ethnic, or gender studies from the prohibitions of subsection (2)(f)
and (g) of this section, provided that a student may not be required or other-
wise compelled to enroll in any such program, department, or course in order
to satisfy the requirements of any other academic degree program, including
general education requirements, or any other major, minor, or certificate
requirements.
(4)(a) Every public institution of higher education shall, on or before
January 15 of each year, submit an annual report to the attorney gen-
eral and the education committees of both the house of representatives
and the senate signed by the president of the institution of higher ed-
ucation certifying that the institution is in compliance with this sec-
tion.
(b) In 2026, this report shall include a list of:
(i) All offices, programs, and initiatives that have existed
within the institution within the preceding two (2) years that
would have constituted a violation of the provisions of subsection
(2) of this section if this section was in effect at such time,
along with the actions taken by the institution to ensure compli-
ance with the provisions of this section;
(ii) Officers, employees, and contractors that have been employed
by or contracted with the institution within the preceding two (2)
years whose employment would have constituted a violation of this
section if this section was in effect at such time, along with the
actions taken by the institution to ensure compliance with the
provisions of this section; and
(iii) Trainings, activities, or courses of instruction required
by the institution within the preceding two (2) years that would
have constituted a violation of this section if this section was in
effect at such time, along with the actions taken by the institu-
tion to ensure compliance with the provisions of this section.
(5) The provisions of this section shall be enforced by the attorney
general as follows:


(a) Any person may notify the attorney general of a violation or poten-
tial violation of this section by an institution of higher education.
The attorney general shall investigate the alleged violation and, if
the attorney general determines that an institution of higher education
has violated any provision of this section, the attorney general shall
send written notice to the institution of higher education with a de-
tailed description of the violation. The attorney general may file suit
for a writ of mandamus or any appropriate injunctive relief compelling
the institution of higher education to comply with the provisions of
this section; and
(b) The attorney general may seek civil penalties for any violations of
this section up to ten percent (10%) of the amount of the institution of
higher education's operating expenses for the offending division, of-
fice, center, or unit within the institution of higher education where
the violation occurred for the state fiscal year preceding that in which
the violation occurred or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), whichever
is greater.
(6)(a) Any student enrolled in a degree program at an institution of
higher education shall have a private cause of action against such an
institution of higher education that violates the provisions of subsec-
tion (2)(a), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of this section to seek injunctive re-
lief.
(b) Any staff member of an institution of higher education shall have a
private cause of action against such an institution of higher education
that violates the provisions of subsection (2)(b), (c), (d), (e), or (g)
of this section to seek injunctive relief.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a civil
action brought under this subsection shall be brought in the county
where a defendant institution of higher education is located and in
which all or a substantial part of the actions or omissions giving rise
to the claim occurred.
(7) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to:
(a) Limit research by students, faculty, or other research personnel
of an institution of higher education or the dissemination of such re-
search;
(b) Limit creative works by students, faculty, or other personnel of an
institution of higher education or the dissemination of such creative
works;
(c) Limit activities of student organizations registered with an in-
stitution of higher education as long as the organization and activity
do not use state funds;
(d) Limit the appearance of guest speakers and performers who do not
receive any form of compensation in exchange for their presentations,
performances, or appearances as long as attendance is voluntary;
(e) Prohibit an institution of higher education from establishing bona
fide qualifications based on sex that are reasonably necessary to the
normal operation of an institution of higher education;
(f) Limit the academic freedom of any individual faculty member of an
institution of higher education to direct the instruction within such


faculty member's own course not otherwise subject to this section or to
limit the free discussion of ideas in a classroom setting;
(g) Prohibit any program or training that is generated by licensed at-
torneys and required for the institution of higher education to comply
with its obligation under title IX of the education amendments of 1972,
the federal Americans with disabilities act, the federal age discrim-
ination in employment act, title VI of the federal civil rights act of
1964, any applicable court order, or other applicable state and fed-
eral law, provided that the institution of higher education makes any
materials associated with such program or training publicly available
on its website;
(h) Prohibit an institution of higher eduction from regulating student
speech or activity that is prohibited by law or from investigating or
soliciting information about potentially illegal speech, speech asso-
ciated with potentially illegal activity, or incidents in which speech
rights were potentially curtailed. Except as further limited by this
section, institutions shall be allowed to restrict student expression
not otherwise protected by section 9, article I of the constitution of
the state of Idaho; or
(i) Prohibit an institution of higher education from supporting citi-
zens of federally recognized American Indian tribes by:
(i) Establishing and maintaining designated centers for American
Indian students;
(ii) Supporting American Indian cultural events; or
(iii) Offering or facilitating scholarships for American Indian
students.
SECTION 3. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 4. APPLICABILITY. No provision of this act shall be construed
to apply to any institution of higher education in any manner retroactively
before July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.